Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1047
Public grazing
funds; distribution to counties; how made.

The
public grazing funds, annually paid to the state treasury by the United States
Government under the federal Taylor Grazing Act, 43 U.S.C. 315i, as such act
existed on May 8, 2001, shall be distributed among the counties of the state
entitled to the same for the benefit of the school districts of such counties based upon information provided by the United States Department
of the Interior under the direction of the Commissioner of Education in the following manner:

(1) The State Treasurer shall annually on the first Monday in July certify
to the commissioner the amount of money received from the United States Government
as Nebraska's proportionate share of the income from the grazing lands within
the state for the most recent complete fiscal year; and

(2) The
commissioner shall, on or before August 5, make apportionment of such funds
to such counties according to the number of acres of grazing land in each
county and certify the apportionment of each county to the county treasurer
of the proper county and to the Director of Administrative Services. The director
shall draw a warrant on the State Treasurer in favor of the various counties
for the amount so specified by the Commissioner of Education.

Laws 1947, c. 300, § 1, p. 916;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2013;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 387, p. 821;

Laws 1951, c. 289, § 1, p. 956;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1312;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 693;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 102;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 34;

Laws 2011, LB333, § 12.